Montana, session 2025, HB496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 2-1-215, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-1-215. Acceptance of jurisdiction over federal lands. The consent of the state is hereby given
to the retrocession of jurisdiction, either partially or wholly, by the United States of America over lands owned
by the United States of America within the boundaries of Montana that are used for national park or military
purposes. The governor is authorized to accept for the state retrocession of jurisdiction."
Section 2. Section 2-1-216, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-1-216. Filing of acceptance of jurisdiction over federal lands. (1) When the state receives
written notification from the authorized official or agent of the United States of America that the United States
desires or is willing to relinquish to the state jurisdiction, or a portion thereof of jurisdiction, over certain lands
owned by the United States within Montana that are used for national park or military purposes, the governor
may accept relinquishment.
(2) After acceptance and approval by the governor, retrocession of jurisdiction becomes effective
upon on filing of the original acceptance with the secretary of state of Montana."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 496
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 496, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 496
INTRODUCED BY E. BUTTREY, S. FITZPATRICK, B. BARKER, B. MERCER, K. SULLIVAN
AN ACT AMENDING LAWS RELATED TO THE RETROCESSION OF JURISDICTION OVER FEDERAL
LANDS; PROVIDING FOR ACCEPTANCE OF JURISDICTION OVER FEDERAL LANDS USED FOR MILITARY
PURPOSES; AND AMENDING SECTIONS 2-1-215 AND 2-1-216, MCA.”